District of Columbia statutes.
42-3402.05

Certification fee.

An owner who seeks to convert must pay the Mayor a certification fee. The Mayor is authorized to collect and establish the amount of the fee. The certification fee shall be sufficient to cover the cost of administering this subchapter.

History

Sept. 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-86, § 205, 27 DCR 2975

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1614.

Editor's Notes

Reenactment of Law 3-86: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3401.01.